District of Columbia statutes.
9-113.04

Repealed

Acceptance of dedicated streets; building restriction lines; right-of-way for sewers and water mains.

Repealed.

May 31, 1900, 31 Stat. 248, ch. 599, § 2
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 713, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-117.